Illinois, session 104th, HB2375.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.01a as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.01a)7    Sec. 5-5.01a. Supportive living facilities program. 8    (a) The Department shall establish and provide oversight 9for a program of supportive living facilities that seek to 10promote resident independence, dignity, respect, and 11well-being in the most cost-effective manner.12    A supportive living facility is (i) a free-standing 13facility or (ii) a distinct physical and operational entity 14within a mixed-use building that meets the criteria 15established in subsection (d). A supportive living facility 16integrates housing with health, personal care, and supportive 17services and is a designated setting that offers residents 18their own separate, private, and distinct living units.19    Sites for the operation of the program shall be selected 20by the Department based upon criteria that may include the 21need for services in a geographic area, the availability of 22funding, and the site's ability to meet the standards.23    Beginning January 1, 2026, the Department shall   HB2375- 2 -LRB104 10005 KTG 20075 b1electronically publicize a list of sites selected in 2accordance with this Section. The list shall be updated at 3least once annually. 4    (b) Beginning July 1, 2014, subject to federal approval, 5the Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities shall be 6equal to the supportive living facility Medicaid rate 7effective on June 30, 2014 increased by 8.85%. Once the 8assessment imposed at Article V-G of this Code is determined 9to be a permissible tax under Title XIX of the Social Security 10Act, the Department shall increase the Medicaid rates for 11supportive living facilities effective on July 1, 2014 by 129.09%. The Department shall apply this increase retroactively 13to coincide with the imposition of the assessment in Article 14V-G of this Code in accordance with the approval for federal 15financial participation by the Centers for Medicare and 16Medicaid Services. 17    The Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities 18effective on July 1, 2017 must be equal to the rates in effect 19for supportive living facilities on June 30, 2017 increased by 202.8%. 21    The Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities 22effective on July 1, 2018 must be equal to the rates in effect 23for supportive living facilities on June 30, 2018. 24    Subject to federal approval, the Medicaid rates for 25supportive living services on and after July 1, 2019 must be at 26least 54.3% of the average total nursing facility services per   HB2375- 3 -LRB104 10005 KTG 20075 b1diem for the geographic areas defined by the Department while 2maintaining the rate differential for dementia care and must 3be updated whenever the total nursing facility service per 4diems are updated. Beginning July 1, 2022, upon the 5implementation of the Patient Driven Payment Model, Medicaid 6rates for supportive living services must be at least 54.3% of 7the average total nursing services per diem rate for the 8geographic areas. For purposes of this provision, the average 9total nursing services per diem rate shall include all add-ons 10for nursing facilities for the geographic area provided for in 11Section 5-5.2. The rate differential for dementia care must be 12maintained in these rates and the rates shall be updated 13whenever nursing facility per diem rates are updated. 14    Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1, 2024, 15the dementia care rate for supportive living services must be 16no less than the non-dementia care supportive living services 17rate multiplied by 1.5. 18    (b-5) Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1, 192025, Medicaid rates for supportive living services must be at 20least 54.75% of the average total nursing services per diem 21rate for the geographic areas defined by the Department and 22shall include all add-ons for nursing facilities for the 23geographic area provided for in Section 5-5.2. 24    (c) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 25Section. Rules that establish or modify the services, 26standards, and conditions for participation in the program   HB2375- 4 -LRB104 10005 KTG 20075 b1shall be adopted by the Department in consultation with the 2Department on Aging, the Department of Rehabilitation 3Services, and the Department of Mental Health and 4Developmental Disabilities (or their successor agencies).5    (d) Subject to federal approval by the Centers for 6Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Department shall accept 7for consideration of certification under the program any 8application for a site or building where distinct parts of the 9site or building are designated for purposes other than the 10provision of supportive living services, but only if: 11        (1) those distinct parts of the site or building are 12    not designated for the purpose of providing assisted 13    living services as required under the Assisted Living and 14    Shared Housing Act; 15        (2) those distinct parts of the site or building are 16    completely separate from the part of the building used for 17    the provision of supportive living program services, 18    including separate entrances; 19        (3) those distinct parts of the site or building do 20    not share any common spaces with the part of the building 21    used for the provision of supportive living program 22    services; and 23        (4) those distinct parts of the site or building do 24    not share staffing with the part of the building used for 25    the provision of supportive living program services. 26    (e) Facilities or distinct parts of facilities which are   HB2375- 5 -LRB104 10005 KTG 20075 b1selected as supportive living facilities and are in good 2standing with the Department's rules are exempt from the 3provisions of the Nursing Home Care Act and the Illinois 4Health Facilities Planning Act.5    (f) Section 9817 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 6(Public Law 117-2) authorizes a 10% enhanced federal medical 7assistance percentage for supportive living services for a 812-month period from April 1, 2021 through March 31, 2022. 9Subject to federal approval, including the approval of any 10necessary waiver amendments or other federally required 11documents or assurances, for a 12-month period the Department 12must pay a supplemental $26 per diem rate to all supportive 13living facilities with the additional federal financial 14participation funds that result from the enhanced federal 15medical assistance percentage from April 1, 2021 through March 1631, 2022. The Department may issue parameters around how the 17supplemental payment should be spent, including quality 18improvement activities. The Department may alter the form, 19methods, or timeframes concerning the supplemental per diem 20rate to comply with any subsequent changes to federal law, 21changes made by guidance issued by the federal Centers for 22Medicare and Medicaid Services, or other changes necessary to 23receive the enhanced federal medical assistance percentage. 24    (g) All applications for the expansion of supportive 25living dementia care settings involving sites not approved by 26the Department by January 1, 2024 (Public Act 103-102) may   HB2375- 6 -LRB104 10005 KTG 20075 b1allow new elderly non-dementia units in addition to new 2dementia care units. The Department may approve such 3applications only if the application has: (1) no more than one 4non-dementia care unit for each dementia care unit and (2) the 5site is not located within 4 miles of an existing supportive 6living program site in Cook County (including the City of 7Chicago), not located within 12 miles of an existing 8supportive living program site in Alexander, Bond, Boone, 9Calhoun, Champaign, Clinton, DeKalb, DuPage, Fulton, Grundy, 10Henry, Jackson, Jersey, Johnson, Kane, Kankakee, Kendall, 11Lake, Macon, Macoupin, Madison, Marshall, McHenry, McLean, 12Menard, Mercer, Monroe, Peoria, Piatt, Rock Island, Sangamon, 13Stark, St. Clair, Tazewell, Vermilion, Will, Williamson, 14Winnebago, or Woodford counties, or not located within 25 15miles of an existing supportive living program site in any 16other county. 17    (h) Beginning January 1, 2025, subject to federal 18approval, for a person who is a resident of a supportive living 19facility under this Section, the monthly personal needs 20allowance shall be $120 per month. 21    (i) (h) As stated in the supportive living program home 22and community-based service waiver approved by the federal 23Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and beginning July 241, 2025, the Department must maintain the rate add-on 25implemented on January 1, 2023 for the provision of 2 meals per 26day at no less than $6.15 per day.   HB2375- 7 -LRB104 10005 KTG 20075 b1    (j) (f) Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 2allow a certified medication aide to administer medication in 3a supportive living facility. For purposes of this subsection, 4"certified medication aide" means a person who has met the 5qualifications for certification under Section 79 of the 6Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act and assists with 7medication administration while under the supervision of a 8registered professional nurse as authorized by Section 50-75 9of the Nurse Practice Act. The Department may adopt rules to 10implement this subsection. 11(Source: P.A. 102-43, eff. 7-6-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 12103-102, Article 20, Section 20-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, 13Article 100, Section 100-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, Article 15, 14Section 15-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 100, Section 15100-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 165, Section 165-5, eff. 166-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-886, eff. 8-9-24; revised 1710-8-24.)